Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2021.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) On or before January 1, 2026, the secretary of state,
after consultation with county election officers, shall adopt rules and
regulations for the use of remote ballot boxes by county election officers
for the return of advance voting ballots. Such regulations shall include the
dates, times and locations for the use of remote ballot boxes and any other
requirements that the secretary deems necessary to preserve the integrity
of the ballots, the remote ballot boxes and the election process.
(b) As used in this section, "remote ballot boxes" means any form of
locked ballot boxes designated by the county election officer as available
for use for depositing advance voting ballots. "Remote ballot boxes" does
not include any ballot boxes located in a county election office or satellite
advance voting site.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.